New York, session 2025-2026, S10411.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 550 of the laws of 2013, amending the 2 environmental conservation law relating to establishing the mercury 3 thermostat collection act, as amended by chapter 242 of the laws of 4 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed January 1, [2027] 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15912-01-6